Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1430XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1430XD (5) 91
jda/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
DIVISION I
REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
Section 1. Section 256.7, subsection 23, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
23. Adopt rules directing the community colleges to
annually and uniformly submit data, including individual-level
data, from the most recent fiscal year to the community
colleges bureau department, using criteria determined and
prescribed by the bureau department via the management
information system.
a. Financial data submitted to the division department by a
community college shall be broken down by fund.
b. Community colleges shall provide data to the community
colleges bureau department by a deadline set by the bureau
department. The deadline shall be set for a date that permits
the bureau department to include the data in a report submitted
for to the state board approval and the general assembly for
review by December March 15 of each year by the house and
senate standing education committees and the joint subcommittee
on education appropriations.
c. The department shall include a statewide summary of the
financial data submitted in accordance with paragraph “a” in
the submit an annual condition of community colleges report,
which upon approval of to the state board, shall be submitted
to and the general assembly on or before February 1 for review
by March 15 of each year. The report must include community
college program level educational and employment outcomes
reports upon availability of all underlying data.
Sec. 2. Section 260C.14, subsection 21, paragraph c, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
c. The department shall submit a report to the general
assembly summarizing incorporate the data submitted in
paragraph “a” by January 15 annually into the annual condition
of community colleges report described in section 256.7,
subsection 23, paragraph “c”.
LSB 1430XD (5) 91
-1- jda/jh 1/5

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 3. Section 261E.3, subsection 3, paragraph j, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
j. All eligible postsecondary institutions providing
programming under this chapter shall include the unique student
identifier assigned to students while in the kindergarten
through grade twelve system as a part of the institution’s
student data management system. Eligible postsecondary
institutions providing programming under this chapter shall
cooperate with the department on data requests related to
the programming. All eligible postsecondary institutions
providing programming under this chapter shall collect data
and report to the department on the proportion of females and
minorities enrolled in science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics-oriented educational opportunities provided in
accordance with this chapter. The department shall submit
incorporate the programming data and the department’s findings
and recommendations in a report to the general assembly
annually by January 15 into the annual condition of community
colleges report described in section 256.7, subsection 23,
paragraph “c”.
DIVISION II
NATIONAL BOARD CERTIFICATION PROGRAM AND STIPENDS
Sec. 4. Section 256.44, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
A national board certification pilot project program is
established to be administered by the department of education.
A teacher, as defined in section 256.145, who registers for or
achieves national board for professional teaching standards
certification, and who is employed by a school district in Iowa
and receiving a salary as a classroom teacher, may be eligible
for the following:
Sec. 5. Section 284.13, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, and
ending June 30, 2025, to the department, the amount of five
LSB 1430XD (5) 91
-2- jda/jh 2/5

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
hundred eight thousand two hundred fifty dollars for the
issuance of national board certification awards in accordance
with section 256.44. Of the amount allocated under this
paragraph, not less than eighty-five thousand dollars shall
be used to administer the ambassador to education position in
accordance with section 256.45.
(2) Notwithstanding section 8.33, funds appropriated
for purposes of this paragraph which remain unencumbered or
unobligated at the close of the fiscal year for which the funds
were appropriated shall not revert but shall be available
for expenditure by the department for purposes of providing
stipends to individuals who receive an advanced dyslexia
specialist endorsement from the board of educational examiners.
The department shall consider the amount of funds available
under this subparagraph when determining the amount of such
stipend.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of
immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment:
The section of this division of this Act amending section
284.13.
DIVISION III
IOWA EDUCATIONAL SERVICES FOR THE BLIND AND VISUALLY IMPAIRED
PROGRAM AND THE IOWA SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
Sec. 7. Section 256.103, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
256.103 Employees —— contracts —— termination and discharge
procedures.
1. Sections 279.12 through 279.19B and section 279.27
apply to employees of the Iowa educational services for the
blind and visually impaired program and employees of the Iowa
school for the deaf, who are licensed pursuant to subchapter
VII, part 3. Section 279.27 applies to employees of the Iowa
educational services for the blind and visually impaired
program and employees of the Iowa school for the deaf, whether
or not licensed pursuant to subchapter VII, part 3, who are
LSB 1430XD (5) 91
-3- jda/jh 3/5

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
responsible for the care, instruction, or supervision of
children. In following those sections in chapter 279, the
references to boards of directors of school districts shall be
interpreted to apply to the department.
2. Notwithstanding chapter 8A, subchapter IV, the
department of administrative services shall, in consultation
with the department of education, establish an annual
compensation schedule applicable to all employees of the Iowa
educational services for the blind and visually impaired
program and all employees of the Iowa school for the deaf and
shall set the employee benefits for such employees.